lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/4.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
%>:0
! %> suffix boundary
! :0  not visible 
;


Sets
Vow = a e o u i ;


Rules
"Sibilant Pl"
0:e <=> [ s | z | s h | c h | x | \Vow y: ] _ %>: s ;
! \Vow : nem mgh
! y: underlying: később változik

"spy rule"
y:i <=> _ :e %>: s ;
! y:ie is not possible


!"Dummy rule"
!b:p <=> _ .#. ;
